Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.070

Member removed from state, request for discharge.

If any member is known to have removed from the state, and, through ignorance or neglect, has failed to apply for discharge, the discharge may be requested by his or her immediate commanding officer.

[ 1989 c 19 s 41; 1963 c 220 s 136; 1943 c 130 s 84; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-84. Cf. 1917 c 107 s 83.]